Nebraska, session 109, LB1214.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1214 LB1214
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Neighborhood association means a resident-led organization
representing a defined geographic area;
(b) Neighborhood data collaborative means a partnership among
neighborhood associations, nonprofits, and regional planning
organizations that uses data to support community-identified priorities;
(c) Pilot program means a time-limited initiative designed to test
implementation models and inform future policy; and
(d) Regional planning organization means a metropolitan or regional
planning entity, including the Metropolitan Area Planning Agency, the
South Central Economic Development District, or similar organizations.
(2) This section authorizes funding from the Department of Health
and Human Services for up to five neighborhood data collaborative pilot
programs. Pilot sites should reflect geographic and community diversity
and demonstrate readiness for implementation.
(3) Each neighborhood data collaborative pilot program shall
demonstrate shared governance and resident leadership and shall include:
(a) At least one regional planning organization;
(b) At least one local nonprofit organization; and
(c) At least three neighborhood associations.
(4) Neighborhood data collaborative pilot program funds shall be
used for technology and data tools, community engagement, resident data
training, staffing, coordination, and evaluation activities. Funds are
intended to support implementation rather than planning alone.
(5) Each neighborhood data collaborative pilot program shall submit
an annual report to the Legislature electronically. Each report shall
include activities, outcomes, resident participation, lessons learned,
and recommendations for scalability.
(6) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $250,000 to
the Department of Health and Human Services for the purposes of carrying
out this section.
-2-